Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201676-3110
Recordation of or agreement imposing
a private transfer fee obligation; liability.

Any person who records or enters
into an agreement imposing a private transfer fee obligation in his or her
favor after March 11, 2011, shall be liable for (1) any and all damages resulting
from the imposition of the private transfer fee obligation on the transfer
of an interest in the real property, including the amount of any transfer
fee paid by a party to the transfer, and (2) all attorney's fees, expenses,
and costs incurred by a party to the transfer or mortgagee of the real property
to recover any private transfer fee paid or in connection with an action to
quiet title. If an agent acts on behalf of a principal to record or secure
a private transfer fee obligation, liability shall be assessed to the principal
rather than the agent.

Laws 2011, LB26, § 10.